Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BOUNDARY WATERS CARE CENTER.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a sole-source grant to Boundary Waters Care Center in Ely, Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end